District of Columbia statutes.
50-403

Commercial motor vehicle driver responsibility.

(a)

Any person who operates a commercial motor vehicle and is domiciled in the District shall have a commercial driver’s license, and all necessary endorsements thereto required by the Mayor for the particular class of vehicle being operated, issued by the Mayor.

(b)

Any person who is issued a commercial motor vehicle driver’s license by the Mayor shall surrender any commercial driver’s license issued by another state at the time the District commercial driver’s license is issued.

(c)

Any person who has a driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled by the Mayor, who loses the right to operate a commercial motor vehicle, or who is disqualified from the operation of a commercial motor vehicle for any period shall notify his or her employer of the suspension, revocation, cancellation, lost right, or disqualification.

(d)

Any person who operates a commercial motor vehicle and applies for employment as an operator of a commercial motor vehicle with an employer shall notify the employer, at the time of application, of his or her previous employment as an operator of a commercial motor vehicle.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 4, 37 DCR 4665
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 102(a), 54 DCR 903
This section is referenced in § 50-405.
1981 Ed., § 40-1803.
D.C. Law 16-279, in subsec. (a), inserted “, and all necessary endorsements thereto required by the Mayor for the particular class of vehicle being operated,” following “shall have a commercial driver’s license”.